New Jersey, session 221, A893.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    (New section)  a.  A board of education shall include age-appropriate instruction on the history and contributions of the Indigenous people of the United States for students in grades kindergarten through 12 as part of the districts implementation of the New Jersey Student Learning Standards in Social Studies. b.    A board of education shall adopt policies and procedures pertaining to the selection of instructional materials to implement the requirements of subsection a. of this section.  When adopting instructional materials for use in the schools of the district, a board of education shall select materials that portray the cultural diversity of Indigenous people. c.     A board of education shall seek the assistance and advice of the New Jersey Commission on American Indian Affairs in fulfilling the requirements of this section. 2.    Section 4 of P.L.1995, c.295 (C.52:16A-56) is amended to read as follows: 4.    The commission shall: a.     develop programs and projects relating to the cultural, educational and social development of New Jersey's American Indian communities; b.    develop programs and projects which further understanding of New Jersey's American Indian history and culture; c.     promote increased cooperation among all American Indian communities in the State; d.    serve as a Statewide reference and resource center to increase public knowledge of New Jersey's American Indian heritage, including providing assistance and advice to school districts with respect to the implementation of instructional requirements pursuant to section 1 of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill); e.     act as a liaison among American Indian communities, the State and federal governments, and educational, social and cultural institutions; f.     be authorized to raise funds, through direct solicitation or other fund raising events, alone or with other groups, and accept gifts, grants and bequests from individuals, corporations, foundations, governmental agencies, public and private organizations and institutions, to defray the commission's administrative expenses and carry out the purposes of P.L.1995, c.295 (C.52:16A-53 et seq.), as amended and supplemented; g.    when requested by the Governor, assist the Legislature and Governor to investigate the authenticity of any organization, tribe, nation or other group seeking official recognition by the State as an American Indian tribe and submit a report of its findings to the Legislature and Governor within 180 days of the completion of an investigation.  Nothing in this subsection shall be construed as authorizing the commission to recognize the authenticity of any organization, tribe, nation or other group as an American Indian tribe, which recognition shall require specific statutory authorization, nor shall this subsection be construed as in any way limiting the scope of information that may be considered in determining whether to grant such statutory recognition. (cf: P.L.2001, c.417, s.4) 3.    This act shall take effect immediately and shall apply to first full school year following the date of enactment.